Washington statutes.
RCW 10.19.040

Officers authorized to take recognizance and approve bail.

Any officer authorized to execute a warrant in a criminal action, may take the recognizance and justify and approve the bail; he or she may administer an oath and examine the bail as to its sufficiency.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1013; Code 1881 s 1034; 1873 p 229 s 214; 1854 p 114 s 78; RRS s 2087. FORMER PART OF SECTION: 1891 c 11 s 13; Code 1881 s 1927; 1873 p 395 s 225; 1854 p 108 s 33; RRS s 1957, now codified in RCW 10.16.070.]